Louisiana, session 2026, SB433.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:460.38 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§460.38. Weight loss medications; required coverage
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall provide Medicaid coverage
for FDA-approved weight loss medications that are medically necessary and are
prescribed by a licensed healthcare provider for a Medicaid recipient. The
coverage criteria for FDA-approved weight loss medications shall be established
by the department.
B. Coverage may be subject to prior authorization as determined by the
department.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health or any Medicaid managed care
organization shall not require step therapy for coverage of weight loss
medication pursuant to this Section.
D. The Louisiana Department of Health shall implement weight loss
coverage in a manner that ensures fiscal sustainability consistent with federal
requirements.
Section 2.(A) The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when
an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the
implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 433 ENROLLED
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.